Hawaii statutes.
§431:19-209 Authorized contracts and
agreements. (a) A special purpose financial captive insurance company
shall insure only the risks of a counterparty and shall not issue a contract
for assumption of risk or indemnification of loss other than a special purpose
financial captive insurance company contract; provided that the special purpose
financial captive insurance company may cede risks assumed through a special
purpose financial captive insurance company to third party reinsurers through
the purchase of reinsurance or retrocession protection on terms approved by the
commissioner.

(b) A special purpose financial captive
insurance company may enter into contracts and agreements with affiliated
entities and third parties to conduct other activities related or incidental to
and necessary to fulfill the purposes of the special purpose financial captive
insurance company contract, the insurance securitization, and this part;
provided that the contracts and activities are included in the special purpose
financial captive insurance company's plan of operation or are otherwise
approved in advance by the commissioner. Those contracts, agreements, and
activities may include but are not limited to:

(1) Entering into special purpose financial captive
insurance company contracts;

(2) Issuing of special purpose financial captive
insurance company securities;

(3) Complying with the terms of the special purpose
financial captive insurance company contracts or securities;

(4) Entering into trust, tax, administration,
reimbursement, or fiscal agent transactions; or

(5) Complying with trust indenture, reinsurance or
retrocession and other contracts, agreements, and activities necessary or
incidental to effectuate an insurance securitization in compliance with the special
purpose financial captive insurance company's plan of operation approved by the
commissioner or as authorized by this part.

(c) A special purpose financial captive
insurance company may enter into swap agreements, or other forms of asset
management agreements, including guaranteed investment contracts, or other
transactions that have the objective of leveling timing differences in funding
of up-front or ongoing transaction expenses or managing asset, credit, or
interest rate risk of the investments in the trust to ensure that the
investments are sufficient to assure payment or repayment of the securities,
and related interest or principal payments issued pursuant to a special purpose
financial captive insurance company insurance securitization transaction or the
obligations of a special purpose financial captive insurance company under a
special purpose financial captive insurance company contract.

(d) A special purpose financial captive
insurance company shall immediately notify the commissioner of any threatened
or pending action by a counterparty or any other person to foreclose or
otherwise take possession of or control over or encumber the collateral
provided by the special purpose financial captive insurance company and part of
the insurance securitization.

(e) Unless otherwise approved in advance by
the commissioner, a special purpose financial captive insurance company shall
not:

(1) Issue or otherwise administer primary insurance
contracts;

(2) Enter into a special purpose financial captive
insurance company contract with a counterparty that is not licensed or
otherwise authorized to transact the business of insurance or reinsurance in at
least its state or country of domicile;

(3) Enter into a special purpose financial captive
insurance contract that contains any provision for payment by the special
purpose financial captive insurance company in discharge of its obligations
under the contract to any person other than the counterparty or receiver;

(4) Have any direct obligation to the policyholders
or reinsured of the counterparty; or

(5) Lend or otherwise invest, or place in custody,
trust, or under management any of its assets with, or to borrow money or
receive a loan from anyone convicted of a felony, anyone convicted of a
criminal offense involving the conversion or misappropriation of funds,
including fiduciary funds or insurance amounts, or theft, deceit, fraud,
misrepresentation, embezzlement, or corruption, or anyone whom the commissioner
has cause to believe has violated, is violating, or is about to violate any
provision of this code, any order of the commissioner, or undertakes or plans
to undertake any action that may cause the special purpose financial captive
insurance company to be in a condition as to render the continuance of the
special purpose financial captive insurance company's business hazardous to the
public or to the holders of the special purpose financial captive insurance
company contracts or special purpose financial captive insurance company
securities. [L 2008, c 190, pt of §1; am L 2009, c 11, §7]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next